Massachusetts, session 194th, H5624.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 67B of chapter 33 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-  
Qualifying next of kin of a fallen service member may apply to the adjutant general for a 
medal of fidelity, in a form prescribed by the adjutant general. There shall be within the 
application for the medal of fidelity a notice that informs applicants of their eligibility to receive 
the medal of fidelity license plate, pursuant to section 2 of chapter 90, free of charge upon 
approval of the application. The notification shall read as follows: “IF YOU RECEIVE THE 
MEDAL OF FIDELITY, YOU ARE ENTITLED TO RECEIVE THE MEDAL OF FIDELITY 
LICENSE PLATE FREE OF CHARGE” and shall include a link to the online application 
established by the registrar of motor vehicles.  
SECTION 2. Section 2 of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby 
amended by inserting after the twenty-third paragraph the following paragraph:-  

of 2 13  The registrar shall furnish without charge to owners of private passenger motor vehicles 
who have been awarded the medal of fidelity pursuant to section 67B of chapter 33 upon 
presentation of satisfactory evidence of such status, as determined by the registrar, distinctive 
registration plates for 1 private passenger motor vehicle owned and principally used by such 
recipient, bearing on the left side an image of the medal and ribbon and bearing the words 
“MEDAL OF FIDELITY” along the bottom. The registrar, in consultation with the adjutant 
general of the Massachusetts national guard, shall notify all past recipients of the medal of 
fidelity, established pursuant to said section 67B of said chapter 33, of their eligibility for the 
medal of fidelity license plate through a letter, which shall include the application for the medal 
of fidelity license plate.  
SECTION 3. Not later than 6 months after the medal of fidelity license plate is designed 
and in circulation, the registrar of motor vehicles, in consultation with the adjutant general of the 
Massachusetts national guard shall notify past recipients of the medal of fidelity concerning their 
eligibility for the medal of fidelity license plate.